bag_ava.lexd
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# VERB PATTERNS
PATTERN Prateritum
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Idecl,B,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Idecl,B,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[IBdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Idecl,A,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Idecl,A,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,B,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,B,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[IBdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,B,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,B,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[IIBdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,A,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,A,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[IAdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,A,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,A,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,B,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,B,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[IIIBdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,A,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,A,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IVdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IVdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Vdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Vdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PratAdd[reg]

PATTERN Imperfect
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IVdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IVdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ImperfAdd[IVdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ImperfAdd[IIdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Idecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Idecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ImperfAdd[Idecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ImperfAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Vdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Vdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ImperfAdd[reg]

PATTERN Potentialis
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,B,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,B,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[IIIdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,B,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,B,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,A,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,A,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[IIIAdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,A,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,A,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[Adecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Vdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Vdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[Vdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Idecl,B,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Idecl,B,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Idecl,A,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Idecl,A,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[Adecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,B,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,B,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[reg]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,A,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,A,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[Adecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IVdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IVdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] PotAdd[reg]

PATTERN Prohibitive
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ProhAdd[IIIdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Idecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Idecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ProhAdd[Idecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IIdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IIdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ProhAdd[IIdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[IVdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[IVdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ProhAdd[IVdecl]
(( agrInitial VerbStem[Vdecl,AgrInit] ) | VerbStem[Vdecl,-AgrInit] ) [:>] ProhAdd[Vdecl]

PATTERN EmphStem
Imperfect EmphAffix

PATTERN PratPart # p. 91
Prateritum PartAffix[irreg]

PATTERN NegPratPart # p. 91
Prateritum negSuffix[pst] PartAffix[irreg]

PATTERN ImpPart # p. 92
Imperfect PartAffix[reg]

PATTERN FutPart # p. 94
Potentialis FutAffix[part] PartAffix[reg]

PATTERN FutNegPartI # pp. 95-96
Prohibitive negSuffix[pst] PartAffix[irreg]

PATTERN FutNegPartII # pp. 95-96
Prohibitive negSuffix[pst] CvbAffix[negFut] FutAffix[part] PartAffix[reg]

PATTERN Masdar # pp. 90-91
Prateritum MasdarEnd[reg]

PATTERN NegMasdar # p. 91
Prateritum negSuffix[pst] MasdarEnd[neg]

PATTERN EmphNegMasdar # p. 95
EmphStem negSuffix[pst] MasdarEnd[neg]

PATTERN EmphNegPratPart # p. 95
EmphStem negSuffix[pst] PartAffix[irreg]

PATTERN EmphFutNegPartI # p. 95
EmphStem ProhAdd[IIIdecl] negSuffix[pst] PartAffix[irreg]

PATTERN EmphFutNegPartII # p. 95
EmphStem ProhAdd[IIIdecl] negSuffix[pst] CvbAffix[negFut] FutAffix[part] PartAffix[reg]

PATTERN IrrPart # p. 99
VerbCopula [<pp>:]
IrrPrtStem [<pp>:]

PATTERN AllMasdars
Masdar
NegMasdar
EmphNegMasdar

PATTERN AllParticiples
PratPart
NegPratPart
ImpPart
FutPart
FutNegPartI
FutNegPartII
EmphNegPratPart
EmphNegPratPart
EmphFutNegPartI
EmphFutNegPartII
IrrPart

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NOUN PATTERNS
PATTERN aPlusHpl
hplPlOblVowel[preA] PlOblMarker[hpl]

# patterns to implement variations of the Vbi marker, see Kibrik 133
PATTERN AbiPl
biPlVowel[Abi] PlMarker[plBi]

PATTERN UbiPl
biPlVowel[Ubi] PlMarker[plBi]

PATTERN IbiPl
biPlVowel[Ibi] PlMarker[plBi]

PATTERN EbiPl
biPlVowel[Ebi] PlMarker[plBi]

PATTERN JabiPl
biPlVowel[Jabi] PlMarker[plBi]

PATTERN NoVbiPl
biPlVowel[noVbi] PlMarker[plBi]

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# NUMERAL PATTERNS
PATTERN decLinks
decimal decComp

PATTERN decimal
rootDec [<*>:] dec

PATTERN centi
rootCent [<*>:] cent

PATTERN milli
rootCent [<*>:] mil

PATTERN singles
rootInit[DaNumber] end[DaNumber]
rootInit[RaNumber] end[RaNumber] # ра, Кибрик et al. С. 155

PATTERN DaSuffixedNums
decimal end
milli end
centi end

PATTERN NomNumbersAgr
rootOne[norm] ( OblAdjSingular[OblSu] | OblAdjPlural[OblPlLu] )
singles ( OblAdjSingular[OblSu] | OblAdjPlural[OblPlLu] )
DaSuffixedNums ( OblAdjSingular[OblSu] | OblAdjPlural[OblPlLu] )

PATTERN NomNumbersNonAgr
rootOne[norm] ( OblAdjSingular[-OblSu,-OblPlLu] | OblAdjPlural[OblPlLi] )
singles OblAdjSingular[OblFLi]
singles OblAdjSingular[OblNLi]
singles OblAdjPlural[OblPlLi]
DaSuffixedNums OblAdjSingular[OblLi]
DaSuffixedNums OblAdjSingular[OblNLi]
DaSuffixedNums OblAdjPlural[OblPlLi]

PATTERN OrdNumbersSer1
singles ordinalOpt? ordinal[ser1]
decLinks singles ordinalOpt? ordinal[ser1] 
DaSuffixedNums ordinalOpt? ordinal[ser1]

PATTERN OrdNumbersSer2
singles ordinalOpt ordinal[ser2] 
decLinks singles ordinalOpt ordinal[ser2] 
DaSuffixedNums ordinalOpt ordinal[ser2]

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# CASE SYSTEM PATTERNS
PATTERN OblAdjAgr
agrFinal[Msg] OblSingular[OblSu]
agrFinal[Hpl] OblPlural[OblPlLu]

PATTERN OblAdjNonAgr
agrFinal[Fsg] OblSingular[OblLi]
agrFinal[Nsg] OblSingular[OblLi]
agrFinal[Npl] OblPlural[OblPlLi]

PATTERN OblAdjDative
agrFinal[Msg] DatExcMin[OblSu]
agrFinal[Fsg] DatExcMin[OblLi]
agrFinal[Nsg] DatExcMin[OblLi]
agrFinal[Hpl] DatExcMin[OblPlLu]
agrFinal[Npl] DatExcMin[OblLi]

PATTERN OblAdjSup
agrFinal[Msg] SupExcMin[OblSu] directCase
agrFinal[Fsg] SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase
agrFinal[Nsg] SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase
agrFinal[Hpl] SupExcMin[OblPlLu] directCase
agrFinal[Npl] SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase

PATTERN LiFusion
SupExceptions[OblFLi]
SupExceptions[OblNLi]
DatExceptions[OblFLi]
DatExceptions[OblNLi]

PATTERN CasesGenAgr
CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom]
genitiveCase[GenAgr]
locMain directCase

PATTERN CasesGenNonAgr
CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom]
genitiveCase[-GenAgr]
locMain directCase

PATTERN CasesAll
CaseMain[ErgR,-nullNom]
genitiveCase
locMain directCase

PATTERN AddCasesMsg
CaseMain[nullNom]
DatExcMin[OblSu]
SupExcMin[OblSu] directCase

PATTERN AddCasesFNsg
CaseMain[nullNom]
DatExcMin[OblLi]
SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase

PATTERN AddCasesHpl
CaseMain[nullNom]
DatExcMin[OblPlLu]
SupExcMin[OblPlLu] directCase

PATTERN AddCasesNpl
CaseMain[nullNom]
DatExcMin[OblLi]
SupExcMin[OblLi] directCase

# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------
# MISCELLANEOUS PATTERNS
PATTERN PronModifiers
NegPronounSuffix
IndefPronounSuffix

PATTERN UCl # = Universal clitics
PostClitic[all]
RestrParticle
ModalParticle
UQparticle
QuestParticle PostClitic[all]?
negSuffix[pst] QuestParticle? PostClitic[all]?

PATTERN NCl # = Nominal clitics
PostClitic
RestrParticle
ModalParticle
UQparticle
QuestParticle PostClitic?
negSuffix[pst] QuestParticle? PostClitic?
